Washington statutes.
RCW 2.30.060

Authorization for therapeutic courts existing on July 24, 2015.

Any therapeutic court meeting the definition of therapeutic court in RCW 2.30.020 and existing on July 24, 2015, continues to be authorized.

[ 2015 c 291 s 7.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2015 c 291: See note following RCW 2.30.010.